



QFLS Qatar Fuel QSC Stock Upcoming and Historical Dividends and Splits








































Qatar Fuel QSC
 QFLS














Collapsed View
Expanded View



Compare






Enter Tickers




Add








Add Benchmark


Morningstar Indices


U.S. Market TR



					Value
				



							U.S. Value TR
						



							Small Value TR
						



							Mid Value TR
						



							Large Value TR
						





					Core
				



							U.S. Core TR
						



							Small Core TR
						



							Mid Core TR
						



							Large Core TR
						





					Growth
				



							U.S. Growth TR
						



							Small Growth TR
						


Mid Growth TR


Large Growth TR





					U.S. Small Cap TR
				



					U.S. Mid Cap TR
				


U.S. Large Cap TR


Dividend Leaders TR


Wide Moat Focus 20 TR



					Information Sup. Sector TR
				


Manufacturing Sup. Sector TR


Service Sup. Sector TR





			US Indices
		



					DJ Industrial Avg. TR
				



					S&P 500 TR
				



					S&P MidCap 400 TR
				



					NASDAQ Composite TR
				



					Russell 2000 TR
				





			Canada
		



					S&P/TSX Composite TR
				





			Europe
		


DJ Stoxx 50 TR EUR



					Euronext BEL 20 PR (BEL)
				



					Euronext Paris CAC 40 TR (FRA)
				



					FTSE 100 TR (GBR)
				



					FTSE 250 TR (GBR)
				



					FSE DAX TR (DEU)
				





			Asia
		



					Nikkei 225 PR (JPN)
				



					Shanghai SE Composite PR (CHN)
				



					CSI 300 CNY
				



					Hang Seng HSI PR HKD
				


S&P/ASX 200 TR





			South Africa
		



					FTSE/JSE All Share Capped TR ZAR
				



					FTSE/JSE Top 40 SWIX TR ZAR
				



					FTSE/JSE All Share SWIX TR ZAR
				



					FTSE/JSE Top 40 NR ZAR
				


FTSE/JSE All Africa Ex South Africa ZAR



					FTSE/JSE All Share TR ZAR
				



					FTSE/JSE SA Listed Property TR ZAR
				



					FTSE/JSE Small Cap TR ZAR
				


FTSE/JSE Financials&Indl TR ZAR


FTSE/JSE SA Industrials TR ZAR



					FTSE/JSE SA Resources TR ZAR
				



 



Clear All
Recent Securities & Benchmarks (max. active = 5)









Growth of 10,000
 QFLS








 
 




							Trailing Total Returns
 QFLS



							Daily

							Monthly

							Quarterly














S&P 500 index data: S&P 500 Copyright © 2017Currency is displayed in QAR.








Historical Prices
 QFLS

Export




Date Range

–



 
5D
1M
3M
YTD
1Y
3Y
5Y
10Y
Max
Custom


Frequency
Daily
Weekly
Monthly
Quarterly
Yearly









Upcoming Dividends
 QFLS





Five Year Dividend History
 QFLS







 

 
 










Fahad Abdullah Al-Subaiey - Chief Marketing Officer at Qatar Fuel-Woqod QSC



























































                      NEWS HOME
                    

Advertising
Board and Executive Moves
Energy
Health Care
Hedge Funds
M & A
Private Equity
Technology








            You have  
            
9 free profiles

              left this month   
			      

                Start Your Free Trial ➤
              








            Hey, we noticed you're a RelSci Pro subscriber! Would you like to view the page there?
            

                View on RelSci Pro ➤
              




























































































































Email







LinkedIn







Facebook







Google+







Tweet







Reddit





Permalink





Fahad Abdullah Al-Subaiey
Chief Marketing Officer at Qatar Fuel-Woqod QSC



Overview
Relationships Paths
Career History Boards & Committees 


Fahad Abdullah Al-Subaiey
Chief Marketing Officer at Qatar Fuel-Woqod QSC



 Overview



Notable Companies


Qatar Petroleum International Ltd. QSC




Board Seats



3





Number of Relationships



                This person is connected to 59 people.
              






 Relationships
              See Details




Khalil Hassan Makki

Former Finance Manager at Qatar Fuel-Woqod QSC




Jaber Ali Al-Hedfa

Chief Financial & Administrative Officer at Qatar Fuel-Woqod QSC





Ahmed Ali Mirza

Chief Operations Officer at Qatar Fuel-Woqod QSC




Bill Ward

Vice President, Gas Supply & Business Development at Superior Pipeline Co. LLC





Ibrahim Jaham Al-Kuwari

Former Chief Executive Officer at Qatar Fuel-Woqod QSC




Soud Mesallam AlDosari

Manager-Logistics, Distribution & Operations at Qatar Fuel-Woqod QSC





Hassan M. Mubarak

Procurement & Contracts Manager at Qatar Fuel-Woqod QSC




Ibrahim Elmakki

Legal Affairs Manager at Qatar Fuel-Woqod QSC





Fawzi Al-Khatib

Strategy & Risk Manager at Qatar Fuel-Woqod QSC




Yousef Al-Sulaiti

Manager-Information & Technology at Qatar Fuel-Woqod QSC







See 49 more listings with RelSci Professional.

Start My Free Trial ➤








See 49 More 


 


 Paths to Fahad Abdullah Al-Subaiey



            Fahad Abdullah Al-Subaiey          




 You



 Connections via Relationship Science



 Fahad Abdullah Al-Subaiey






Sync your contacts to see how you can connect with Fahad Abdullah Al-Subaiey.

Start My Free Trial ➤








See  More 


 


 Career History



Chief Marketing Officer

                                    2016 - Current                


Qatar Fuel-Woqod QSC


                  Qatar Fuel-Woqod QSC engages in the sale, marketing, and distribution of oil, gas, and petroleum products. It operates through the Refined Petroleum Products and Technical Inspection of Vehicles segments. It offers lubricants, liquefied petroleum gas, natural gas, and bitumen products. The company was founded on February 10, 2002 and is headquartered in Doha, Qatar.                




Executive Director-Gas & Power

                                    Prior                


Qatar Petroleum International Ltd. QSC


                  Qatar Petroleum International Ltd. QSC provides petroleum exploration services. It seeks to invest in overseas companies that produce, develop and explore for oil and natural gas as well as in companies who manage gas and power, refining and petrochemicals and other midstream and downstream activities. The company was founded in 1974 and is headquartered in Doha, Qatar.                





 Boards & Committees



Corporate Boards ▾




Vice Chairman

                    2013 - 2015                  


Abdulla Bin Turky Independent School






Chairman

                    2011 - 2013                  


South Hook Gas Co. Ltd.






Non-Profit Boards ▾




Chairman

                    2007 - 2013                  


Gas Processors Association

                    TO PROMOTE THE GAS PROCESSING INDUSTRY AND FURTHER EDUCATION AND RESEARCH INTO THE GAS PROCESSING FIELD.                  





 Other Affiliations




              Fahad Abdullah Al-Subaiey is affiliated with
                            Qatar Fuel-Woqod QSC, Qatar Petroleum International Ltd. QSC, Abdulla Bin Turky Independent School, South Hook Gas Co. Ltd., Gas Processors Association.
            





You've reached your 10 free profiles limit this month.
Upgrade to RelSci Pro today to enjoy unlimited article views and much more!

Start My Free Trial  ➤

Still not convinced? Check out our full listing of features here.












Are you a RelSci Pro Subscriber?

Login to RelSci Pro 
                        ➤


Not a Pro Subscriber? Log in here to manage your alerts









 Keep me signed in.
        

Login  ➤



        Forgot your Password?
    

























 I have read the LexisNexis terms & conditions




Sign Me Up  ➤

















Qatar Fuel WOQOD QSC Interview Questions | MockQuestions


























							Home
						










							Career Interview Questions
						










							Interview Topics
						










							Upgrade
						










							Login
						









						Close
					













   Sign in




   Upgrade








						Top 25						Qatar Fuel WOQOD QSC Interview Questions
			





1. The energy sector can include a lot of red tape and regulations.Are you accustomed to waiting on logistics and policy during your projects? 







						Professional Answer					
































						Want to see the answer?
					




							Upgrade
						










							
								Next Interview Question   












			List of Qatar Fuel WOQOD QSC Interview Questions
		











The energy sector can include a lot of red tape and regulations.Are you accustomed to waiting on logistics and policy during your projects? 
The energy sector often sees changes in regulation and policy. How do you keep up to date on changes in our industry?
At Qatar Fuel WOQOD QSC we seek to hire individuals with related post-secondary education. Walk me through your formal education. 
At Qatar Fuel WOQOD QSC we put a lot of emphasis on attention to detail which some people mistake for micromanagement. How do you feel about this? 
In which ways do you feel that Qatar Fuel WOQOD QSC stands out from industry competitors? 
What are your thoughts on the stance environmentalists take against some of our practices in the energy industry? 
At Qatar Fuel WOQOD QSC we put a strong focus on health and safety. What is your experience with health and safety in the energy industry? 
The energy sector has many competitors. Why do you want to work for Qatar Fuel WOQOD QSC?
Do you have any experience in SAP? 
At: company: we use a variety of robust internal software programs. Do you consider yourself tech savvy and a fast learner? 
At Qatar Fuel WOQOD QSC we like to stay ahead of our industry competitors. In your opinion, what are we doing right? 
What accomplishment do you believe was the most difficult for you to achieve?
When have you had to think quickly in response to sudden change?
Describe your three greatest accomplishments to date.
Tell me about your experiences giving presentations in front of large groups. 
What career path interests you the most in this company?
What type of work environment do you dislike working in?
How do you deal with uncomfortable situations?
How many days were you absent from work last year?
Do people see you as a trustworthy and honest individual?
How can we motivate you on the job? 
How do you respond to feedback?
Tell me when you have delegated tasks effectively.
What do you see as the most difficult task in being a manager?
What are your salary expectations?
What are your career goals?
What would you do if a client asked you about a product or service and you were unsure of the answer?
Looking at your resume, I see multiple gaps between employments, what were you doing during those gaps?
Tell me about your experience with team building exercises. 
If you were the successful candidate, how much notice would you require to give your current employer?








				Professional answers by:
			







		
				Rachelle Enns				
				Recruiter				
 rachelle_enns &nbsp		

			










Qatar Fuel WOQOD QSC User Submitted Interview Answers				






Question 
1 of 30




								The energy sector can include a lot of red tape and regulations.Are you accustomed to waiting on logistics and policy during your projects? 							



  
								










Question 
2 of 30




								The energy sector often sees changes in regulation and policy. How do you keep up to date on changes in our industry?							



  
								










Question 
3 of 30




								At Qatar Fuel WOQOD QSC we seek to hire individuals with related post-secondary education. Walk me through your formal education. 							



  
								










Question 
4 of 30




								At Qatar Fuel WOQOD QSC we put a lot of emphasis on attention to detail which some people mistake for micromanagement. How do you feel about this? 							



  
								










Question 
5 of 30




								In which ways do you feel that Qatar Fuel WOQOD QSC stands out from industry competitors? 							



  
								


















Question 
6 of 30




								What are your thoughts on the stance environmentalists take against some of our practices in the energy industry? 							



  
								










Question 
7 of 30




								At Qatar Fuel WOQOD QSC we put a strong focus on health and safety. What is your experience with health and safety in the energy industry? 							



  
								










Question 
8 of 30




								The energy sector has many competitors. Why do you want to work for Qatar Fuel WOQOD QSC?							



  
								


















Question 
9 of 30




								Do you have any experience in SAP? 							



  
								










Question 
10 of 30




								At: company: we use a variety of robust internal software programs. Do you consider yourself tech savvy and a fast learner? 							



  
								










Question 
11 of 30




								At Qatar Fuel WOQOD QSC we like to stay ahead of our industry competitors. In your opinion, what are we doing right? 							



  
								


















Question 
12 of 30




								What accomplishment do you believe was the most difficult for you to achieve?							



  
								










Question 
13 of 30




								When have you had to think quickly in response to sudden change?							



  
								










Question 
14 of 30




								Describe your three greatest accomplishments to date.							



  
								










Question 
15 of 30




								Tell me about your experiences giving presentations in front of large groups. 							



  
								










Question 
16 of 30




								What career path interests you the most in this company?							



  
								










Question 
17 of 30




								What type of work environment do you dislike working in?							



  
								










Question 
18 of 30




								How do you deal with uncomfortable situations?							



  
								










Question 
19 of 30




								How many days were you absent from work last year?							



  
								










Question 
20 of 30




								Do people see you as a trustworthy and honest individual?							



  
								










Question 
21 of 30




								How can we motivate you on the job? 							



  
								










Question 
22 of 30




								How do you respond to feedback?							



  
								










Question 
23 of 30




								Tell me when you have delegated tasks effectively.							



  
								










Question 
24 of 30




								What do you see as the most difficult task in being a manager?							



  
								










Question 
25 of 30




								What are your salary expectations?							



  
								










Question 
26 of 30




								What are your career goals?							



  
								










Question 
27 of 30




								What would you do if a client asked you about a product or service and you were unsure of the answer?							



  
								










Question 
28 of 30




								Looking at your resume, I see multiple gaps between employments, what were you doing during those gaps?							



  
								










Question 
29 of 30




								Tell me about your experience with team building exercises. 							



  
								










Question 
30 of 30




								If you were the successful candidate, how much notice would you require to give your current employer?							



  
								














Popular Category Reports|Industry Specific|Bharat Book














































Toggle navigation













  

Bharat 
            Book Bureau
 Your One-Stop-Shop for business information







Welcome Guest   Log In   Register 





   $ - USD 


$ - USD
€ - EUR
£ - GBP
Rs - INR


  |    item(s) :  0    
						
						
											
						  













Market Reports
Country  Reports
Company Reports
Online Database
Custom Research
Discounted Reports
Conferences & Seminars
Publisher Signup



Our Products 

Market Reports
Country  Reports
Company Reports
Online Databases
Custom Research
Discounted Reports
Conferences & Seminars
Publishers Signup








 Search
 







  
        MARKET REPORTS  
        COUNTRY REPORTS  
        COMPANY REPORTS  
        CUSTOM RESEARCH ONLINE 
        DATABASES DISCOUNTED REPORTS 






Home
Categories




POPULAR CATEGORIES











Consumer Goods
Consumer goods market is an ever growing industry. This industry is evolving with time and with better technology and innovation there are new and advanced products coming to the market. Bharat book o..



 View Sub-Categories 















Energy & Utility
Bharat book presents comprehensive market analysis and research reports on energy and utilities industry. Energy and utility market deals with various types of energy sources which are available aroun..



 View Sub-Categories 















Food & Beverages
Food and Beverage Market is the most thriving industry in the world. This market is not only growing rapidly but with technological advancement food and beverage industry is forming new and better pro..



 View Sub-Categories 















Industry & Mfg
Industry and manufacturing most of the time goes hand in hand. An establishment or unit bringing in any kind of raw material and producing them into finished products with help of power driven machine..



 View Sub-Categories 
















Life Sciences
Life sciences is a subject that studies the field of science which involves the scientific examination of living organisms such as microorganisms, plants, animals, and human beings, as well as related..



 View Sub-Categories 















Service Industry
The service industry is a compilation of sectors wherein companies or institutions are rendering services to the consumers in profiteering or non profiteering basis. This ranges from transportation, p..



 View Sub-Categories 















Technology & Media
With the eve of the new millennium, technology and media has become an integral part of any business house. It has become a tool for the growth and development of any business. With the revolution in ..



 View Sub-Categories 































Market Research Reports, Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. (QFLS) - Financial and Strategic SWOT Analysis Review





























Home  | Contact Us |
			  			    Log In



 


(888) 789-6604

















All Categories
Automotive and Transportation
Banking & Finance
Computer &  IT
Consumer Packaged Goods 
Consumer Retail
Electronics & Security
Energy, Utility and Renewable
Internet
Manufacturing & Industry
Pharma & Healthcare
Sustainable Technology
Telecom
Travel & Lifestyle








Advanced search





Account Detail

0 items in basket



Order History
Total $


Saved Searches
View Basket 



 




Automotive and Transportation  
      




Automotive and Transportation

Aftermarket
Commercial Vehicles
Powertrain
Safety
Telematics




Freight
Logistics & Shipping
Rail
Intelligent transport systems
Airway
Public Transport
Company profiles




Banking & Finance
      




Banking & Finance

Retail Banking
Insurance





Wealth management
Banking Services




Consumer Packaged Goods 
      




Consumer Packaged Goods

Food
Beverages - Non-Alcoholic
Personal Care




Beverages - Alcoholic
Household Products
Company Profiles




Computer  &  IT
      




Computer  &  IT

Software
Cloud Computing
IT Services




IT Hardware Computer Products Distribution & Support
Company Profiles Country Overview (Computing & Electronics)




Consumer & Retail
      




Consumer & Retail

Clothing
Supermarkets
Electricals and Electronics

 

Housekeeping and Gardening Supplies
Food and Drink Specialists
Company Profiles




Energy, Utility and Renewable
      




Energy, Utility and Renewable

Utilities
Commodity
Natural Resources




Renewable Energy
Company profiles








Electronics & Security
      




Electronics & Security

Electronic Devices
Automatic Identification


Surface Mount Technology (SMT)
Company profiles




Internet
      




Internet

Advertising
Company Profiles
E-Commerce




Gaming
Popular Culture
Social Media




Manufacturing  &  Industry
      




Manufacturing  &  Industry

Industry
Automation & Process Control




Miscellaneous Manufacturing
Company Profiles




Pharma & Healthcare
      




Pharma Healthcare

Clinical Diagnostics
Biotechnology
Healthcare and Life Sciences IT




Medical Devices
Pharmaceuticals
Company Profiles




Sustainable Technology
      




Sustainable Technology

Country Overviews (Transport & Travel)
Maritime
Service Stations
Transport & Travel
Air
Bus




Company Reports (Transport & Travel)
Freight
Logistics & Shipping
Misc. Transport & Travel
Public Transport
Railway
Roads




Telecom
      




Telecom

Telecommunication  &  Broadband 3G / WiMAX
Conferencing  &  Collaboration
Mobile  &  Wireless




Network infrastructure  &  Security
Emerging technologies
Retail Systems
Enterprise solutions
Company Profiles




Travel & Lifestyle
	   




Travel & Lifestyle

Hotels
Travel Agencies
Modes of Travel




Art
Leisure
Luxury Brands














Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. (QFLS) - Financial and Strategic SWOT Analysis Review





Publication Date
May 2014



Product Type
Report


Pages
30


Single User License help
$
					125.00					   


Site User License help
$
                      250.00


Corporate User License help
$
                      375.00









 














Reportstack.com does not charge credit card fee, transaction charges, extra tax or VAT on any purchase.






Summary
Table of Contents

Related Products
Speak with an expert


Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. (QFLS) - Financial and Strategic SWOT Analysis Review provides you an in-depth strategic SWOT analysis of the company’s businesses and operations. The profile has been compiled by GlobalData to bring to you a clear and an unbiased view of the company’s key strengths and weaknesses and the potential opportunities and threats. The profile helps you formulate strategies that augment your business by enabling you to understand your partners, customers and competitors better.The profile contains critical company information including:- Business description – A detailed description of the company’s operations and business divisions.- Corporate strategy – Analyst’s summarization of the company’s business strategy.- SWOT Analysis – A detailed analysis of the company’s strengths, weakness, opportunities and threats.- Company history – Progression of key events associated with the company.- Major products and services – A list of major products, services and brands of the company.- Key competitors – A list of key competitors to the company.- Key employees – A list of the key executives of the company.- Executive biographies – A brief summary of the executives’ employment history.- Key operational heads – A list of personnel heading key departments/functions.- Important locations and subsidiaries – A list and contact details of key locations and subsidiaries of the company.- Detailed financial ratios for the past five years – The latest financial ratios derived from the annual financial statements published by the company with 5 years history.- Interim ratios for the last five interim periods – The latest financial ratios derived from the quarterly/semi-annual financial statements published by the company for 5 interims history.HighlightsQatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. (Qatar Fuel) is a downstream energy company. It carries out storage, distribution, and marketing of liquefied petroleum gas (LPG), gas, and refined products. The company is a sole distributor of fuels in Qatar and distributes its products through a fleet of over 350 road tankers. It also supplies diesel and gasoline for vehicles, boats and industry, and aviation fuel for the Doha International Airport. The company trades in bunker fuels, bitumen importation and distribution for new roads, LPG for domestic purpose, and own-branded lubricants. Moreover, the company also conducts ship-to-ship bunkering activities and markets its own full range of branded lubricants.Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. Key Recent DevelopmentsOct 02, 2014: Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Net Profit Reached QR 1,216 Million for The Year  2013Aug 02, 2014: Sidra Doha Supplied the Biggest Dredger Ship in the World with BunkerMar 11, 2014: WOQOD Board of Directors appoints new CEOKey benefits of buying this profile include:You get detailed information about the company and its operations to identify potential customers and suppliers.- The profile analyzes the company’s business structure, operations, major products and services, prospects, locations and subsidiaries, key executives and their biographies and key competitors.Understand and respond to your competitors’ business structure and strategies, and capitalize on their weaknesses. Stay up to date on the major developments affecting the company.- The company’s core strengths and weaknesses and areas of development or decline are analyzed and presented in the profile objectively. Recent developments in the company covered in the profile help you track important events.Equip yourself with information that enables you to sharpen your strategies and transform your operations profitably.- Opportunities that the company can explore and exploit are sized up and its growth potential assessed in the profile. Competitive and/or technological threats are highlighted.Scout for potential investments and acquisition targets, with detailed insight into the companies’ strategic, financial and operational performance.- Financial ratio presented for major public companies in the profile include the revenue trends, profitability, growth, margins and returns, liquidity and leverage, financial position and efficiency ratios.Gain key insights into the company for academic or business research.- Key elements such as SWOT analysis, corporate strategy and financial ratios and charts are incorporated in the profile to assist your academic or business research needs.Note: Some sections may be missing if data is unavailable for the company


Table of Contents  Table of Contents  2List of Tables  3List of Figures  3Section 1 - About the Company  4Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. - Key Facts  4Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. - Key Employees  5Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. - Key Employee Biographies  6Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. - Key Operational Employees  7Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. - Major Products and Services  8Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. - Key Operational Summary  9Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. - History  10Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. - Company Statement  12Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. - Locations And Subsidiaries  13Head Office  13Other Locations & Subsidiaries  13Section 2 – Company Analysis  14Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. - Business Description  14Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. - Corporate Strategy  15Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. - SWOT Analysis  16SWOT Analysis - Overview  16Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. - Strengths  16Strength - Distribution Network  16Strength - Product and Service Portfolio  16Strength - Compliance with Quality Standards  16Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. - Weaknesses  16Weakness - Increasing Costs  16Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. - Opportunities  17Opportunity - Expansion Initiatives  17Opportunity - Increasing Petroleum Consumption  17Opportunity - Strong Support from Qatar Petroleum  17Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. - Threats  17Threat - Changing Focus from Fossil Fuel to Renewables  17Threat - Stringent Environmental Regulations  18Threat - Fluctuations in Oil and Gas Prices  18Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. - Key Competitors  19Section 3 – Company Financial Ratios  20Financial Ratios - Capital Market Ratios  20Financial Ratios - Annual Ratios  20Performance Chart  22Financial Performance  22Financial Ratios - Interim Ratios  23Financial Ratios - Ratio Charts  24Section 4 – Appendix  25Methodology  25Ratio Definitions  25About GlobalData  29Contact Us  30Disclaimer  30List of TablesList of Tables  Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C., Key Facts  4Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C., Key Employees  5Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C., Key Employee Biographies  6Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C., Key Operational Employees  7Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C., Major Products and Services  8Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C., Key Operational Summary, 2011  9Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C., History  10Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C., Subsidiaries  13Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C., Key Competitors  19Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C., Ratios based on current share price  20Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C., Annual Ratios  20Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C., Interim Ratios  23Currency Codes  25Units  25Capital Market Ratios  25Equity Ratios  26Profitability Ratios  26Cost Ratios  27Liquidity Ratios  27Leverage Ratios  28Efficiency Ratios  28List of FiguresList of Figures  Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C., Performance Chart (2009 - 2013)  22Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C., Ratio Charts  24






Title
Date
Price






United States PV Module Industry 2016 Market Research Report


By QYResearch

The United States PV Module Industry 2016 Market Research Report is a professional and in-depth study on the current state of the PV Module industry.

The report provides a basic overview of the indus						...Read More




Mar 2016
 $3800.00





2012-2022 Report on Global Power Lithium Battery Market Competition, Status and Forecast, Market Size by Players, Regions, Type, Application


By QYResearch

In this report, the global Power Lithium Battery market is valued at USD XX million in 2016 and is expected to reach USD XX million by the end of 2022, growing at a CAGR of XX% between 2016 and 2022.
						...Read More




Mar 2017
 $2958.00





2013 Global Biopower Market - Supply Chain Bottlenecks Leave the Market Downcast

By GlobalData

2013 Global Biopower Market - Supply Chain Bottlenecks Leave the Market DowncastSummaryThe global biopower market recorded a total installed capacity of 84,256 MW by the year end 2013. The key countri						...Read More




Jun 2014
 $500.00





2014 Global Thermal Power Market Half-Yearly Update

By GlobalData

2014 Global Thermal Power Market Half-Yearly UpdateSummaryThermal power represents the majority of global electricity generation and will continue to dominate in the future. The global thermal power m						...Read More




Aug 2014
 $500.00





2014 Global Thermal Power Market Update

By GlobalData

2014 Global Thermal Power Market UpdateSummaryStable growth in coal and gas-fired capacity expected: Coal and gas installed capacity are expected to increase during the forecast period to 2025 while o						...Read More




Feb 2015
 $500.00





2014 Refinery Outlook: High Refining Utilization in U.S.

By GlobalData

2014 Refinery Outlook: High Refining Utilization in U.S.

Summary

Report provides an overview of refining throughput activities forecast on a quarterly basis for 2014 by region compared to 2013 highl						...Read More




Apr 2014
 $1000.00





2014 Wind Turbine Order Intake - Siemens Leads the Market Due to Growth in Offshore Activity

By GlobalData

2014 Wind Turbine Order Intake - Siemens Leads the Market Due to Growth in Offshore ActivitySummaryAnnual wind capacity additions are expected to reach a record high of 48 Gigawatts (GW) in 2014, havi						...Read More




Jul 2014
 $500.00





2016 Market Research Report on United States Oil Shale Industry

By QYResearch

The 2016 Market Research Report on United States Oil Shale Industry is a professional and in-depth study on the current state of the Oil Shale industry.The report provides a basic overview of the indu						...Read More




Sep 2016
 $3800.00





2017-2022 Direct Drive Wind Power Converter Report on Global and United States Market, Status and Forecast, by Players, Types and Applications


By QYResearch

This report studies the Direct Drive Wind Power Converter market status and outlook of global and United States, from angles of players, regions, product types and end industries; this report analyzes						...Read More




Mar 2017
 $2960.00





2017-2022 Energy Storage Systems(ESS)Report on Global and United States Market, Status and Forecast, by Players, Types and Applications


By QYResearch

This report studies the Energy Storage Systems (ESS) market status and outlook of global and United States, from angles of players, regions, product types and end industries; this report analyzes the 						...Read More




Apr 2017
 $2960.00











 
* Required field


Name *



E-mail *



Telephone 





Company  * 



Country *

Select
Albania
Algeria
American Samoa
Angola
Anguilla
Antarctica
Antigua and Barbuda
Argentina
Armenia
Aruba
Australia
Austria
Automobile
Azerbaijan
Bahamas
Bahrain
Bangladesh
Barbados
Belarus
Belgium
Belize
Benin
Bermuda
Bhutan
Bolivia
Bosnia and Herzegowina
Botswana
Bouvet Island
Brazil
British Indian Ocean Territory
Brunei Darussalam
Bulgaria
Burkina Faso
Burundi
Cambodia
Cameroon
Canada
Cape Verde
Cayman Islands
Central African Republic
Chad
Chile
China
Christmas Island
Cocos (Keeling) Islands
Colombia
Comoros
Congo
Cook Islands
Costa Rica
Cote D'Ivoire
Croatia
Cuba
Cyprus
Czech Republic
Denmark
Deutschland
Djibouti
Dominica
Dominican Republic
East Timor
Ecuador
Egypt
El Salvador
Equatorial Guinea
Eritrea
Estonia
Ethiopia
Falkland Islands (Malvinas)
Faroe Islands
Fiji
Finland
France
France, Metropolitan
French Guiana
French Polynesia
French Southern Territories
Gabon
Gambia
Georgia
Germany
Ghana
Gibraltar
Greece
Greenland
Grenada
Guadeloupe
Guam
Guatemala
Guinea
Guinea-bissau
Guyana
Haiti
Heard and Mc Donald Islands
Honduras
Hong Kong
Hungary
Iceland
India
Indonesia
Iran (Islamic Republic of)
Iraq
Ireland
Israel
Italy
Jamaica
Japan
Jordan
Kazakhstan
Kenya
Kiribati
Korea, Democratic People's Republic of
Korea, Republic of
Kuwait
Kyrgyzstan
Lao People's Democratic Republic
Latvia
Lebanon
Lesotho
Liberia
Libyan Arab Jamahiriya
Liechtenstein
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Macau
Macedonia, The Former Yugoslav Republic of
Madagascar
Malawi
Malaysia
Maldives
Mali
Malta
Marshall Islands
Martinique
Mauritania
Mauritius
Mayotte
Mexico
Micronesia, Federated States of
Moldova, Republic of
Monaco
Mongolia
Montserrat
Morocco
Mozambique
Myanmar
Namibia
Nauru
Nepal
Netherlands
Netherlands Antilles
New Caledonia
New Zealand
Nicaragua
Niger
Nigeria
Niue
Norfolk Island
Northern Mariana Islands
Norway
Oman
Pakistan
Palau
Panama
Papua New Guinea
Paraguay
Peru
Philippines
Pitcairn
Poland
Portugal
Puerto Rico
Qatar
Reunion
Romania
Russian Federation
Rwanda
Saint Kitts and Nevis
Saint Lucia
Saint Vincent and the Grenadines
Samoa
San Marino
Sao Tome and Principe
Saudi Arabia
Senegal
Seychelles
Sierra Leone
Singapore
Slovakia (Slovak Republic)
Slovenia
Solomon Islands
Somalia
South Africa
South Georgia and the South Sandwich Islands
Spain
Sri Lanka
St. Helena
St. Pierre and Miquelon
Sudan
Suriname
Svalbard and Jan Mayen Islands
Swaziland
Sweden
Switzerland
Syrian Arab Republic
Taiwan
Tajikistan
Tanzania, United Republic of
Thailand
Togo
Tokelau
Tonga
Trinidad and Tobago
Tunisia
Turkey
Turkmenistan
Turks and Caicos Islands
Tuvalu
Uganda
Ukraine
United Arab Emirates
United Kingdom
United States
United States Minor Outlying Islands
Uruguay
Uzbekistan
Vanuatu
Vatican City State (Holy See)
Venezuela
Viet Nam
Virgin Islands (British)
Virgin Islands (U.S.)
Wallis and Futuna Islands
Western Sahara
Yemen
Yugoslavia
Zaire
Zambia
Zimbabwe



Query  






 








 
 

 





Published By :  GlobalData 











					  For support please contact:
US Toll Free
+1 888-789-6604


Asia Pacific
+91-9893555190 
							
							







 














 











To receive alerts about an update, future offers and discounts on this report, signup here.Email ID











 









 Companies
A
B
C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z 


 Countries

A
B C
D
E
F
G
H
I J
K L
M N
O P
Q R
S T
U V
W X
Y Z 













About Us | 
	  Contact Us | 
	  FAQ's |
	  Terms and Conditions | 
	  Privacy Policy | 
	  Return Policy





	Market Report: Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. (QFLS) - Financial and Strategic SWOT Analysis Review

















































ABOUT US

• PUBLISHERS
• CONTACT US
• CART




Login | Register















All Industries
Business & Finance
-- Business
-- Financial Services
-- Insurance
-- Marketing
Consumer & Food
-- Beverages
-- Consumer Goods
-- Food
-- Retailing
Healthcare
-- Biotechnology
-- Healthcare
-- Medical Devices
-- Pharmaceuticals
Heavy Industry
-- Construction
-- Energy
-- Manufacturing
-- Materials
-- Transportation
Internet & Media
-- E-Business
-- Internet
-- Media
-- Publishing
Public Sector
-- Defense
-- Education
-- Government
Telecom & Computing
-- Computer Technology
-- Fixed Networks
-- Software
-- Wireless
Company/Country Reports
-- Company Reports
-- Country Reports
-- Regional Reports


 
            













                        Processing...




Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. (QFLS) - Financial and Strategic SWOT Analysis Review

     
                        Jul 21, 2015 - GlobalData 
                    
                - 39 pages 
                - USD $125 
         





Click here to open the POPUP


                        You've added the following report to your cart:CLOSE








Cart Summary



                                    Total Items: 
                                

                                    SubTotal: 
                                


    









Report Summary


Table of Contents


Companies


Request Details


Related







Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. (QFLS) - Financial and Strategic SWOT Analysis Review provides you an in-depth strategic SWOT analysis of the company's businesses and operations. The profile has been compiled by GlobalData to bring to you a clear and an unbiased view of the company's key strengths and weaknesses and the potential opportunities and threats. The profile helps you formulate strategies that augment your business by enabling you to understand your partners, customers and competitors better.The profile contains critical company information including:Business description - A detailed description of the company's operations and business divisions.Corporate strategy - Analyst's summarization of the company's business strategy.SWOT Analysis - A detailed analysis of the company's strengths, weakness, opportunities and threats.Company history - Progression of key events associated with the company.Major products and services - A list of major products, services and brands of the company.Key competitors - A list of key competitors to the company.Key employees - A list of the key executives of the company.Executive biographies - A brief summary of the executives' employment history.Key operational heads - A list of personnel heading key departments/functions.Important locations and subsidiaries - A list and contact details of key locations and subsidiaries of the company.Detailed financial ratios for the past five years - The latest financial ratios derived from the annual financial statements published by the company with 5 years history.Interim ratios for the last five interim periods - The latest financial ratios derived from the quarterly/semi-annual financial statements published by the company for 5 interims history.HighlightsQatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. (Qatar Fuel) is a downstream energy company. It carries out distribution, storage and marketing of fuel, liquefied petroleum gas (LPG), gas and refined petroleum products. The company is a sole distributor of fuels in Qatar, operating through a fleet of over 600 road tankers. It also supplies diesel and gasoline for vehicles, boats and industry, and aviation fuel for the Doha International Airport. Qatar Fuel trades in bunker fuels, bitumen importation and distribution for new roads, LPG for domestic purpose, and own-branded lubricants. The company also conducts ship-to-ship bunkering activities and markets its own range of branded lubricants. Qatar Fuel is headquartered in Doha, Qatar.The company focuses on diversifying its products and services and expanding its operations in the GCC and other countries. In line with this approach, it is establishing a WOQOD service station in the Saudi Arabia.Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. Key Recent DevelopmentsJun 10, 2015: Woqod To Set Up 15 Portable Fuel StationsMay 12, 2015: Qatar Fuel "WOQOD" Inaugurates Lijmiliya Service StationMar 05, 2015: Qatar Fuel "WOQOD" Inaugurates Al-Wajbah Service StationDec 12, 2013: WOQOD Opens A New Service Station In North MesaieedNov 17, 2013: WOQOD Opens A New Service Station In Bu SamraKey benefits of buying this profile include:You get detailed information about the company and its operations to identify potential customers and suppliers.The profile analyzes the company's business structure, operations, major products and services, prospects, locations and subsidiaries, key executives and their biographies and key competitors.Understand and respond to your competitors' business structure and strategies, and capitalize on their weaknesses. Stay up to date on the major developments affecting the company.The company's core strengths and weaknesses and areas of development or decline are analyzed and presented in the profile objectively. Recent developments in the company covered in the profile help you track important events.Equip yourself with information that enables you to sharpen your strategies and transform your operations profitably.Opportunities that the company can explore and exploit are sized up and its growth potential assessed in the profile. Competitive and/or technological threats are highlighted.Scout for potential investments and acquisition targets, with detailed insight into the companies' strategic, financial and operational performance.Financial ratio presented for major public companies in the profile include the revenue trends, profitability, growth, margins and returns, liquidity and leverage, financial position and efficiency ratios.Gain key insights into the company for academic or business research.Key elements such as SWOT analysis, corporate strategy and financial ratios and charts are incorporated in the profile to assist your academic or business research needs.Note: Some sections may be missing if data is unavailable for the company
Table of ContentsTable of ContentsList of TablesList of FiguresSection 1 - About the CompanyQatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. - Key FactsQatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. - Key EmployeesQatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. - Key Employee BiographiesQatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. - Key Operational EmployeesQatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. - Major Products and ServicesQatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. - Key Operational SummaryQatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. - HistoryQatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. - Company StatementQatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. - Locations And SubsidiariesHead OfficeOther Locations & SubsidiariesSection 2 - Company AnalysisQatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. - Business DescriptionQatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. - Corporate StrategyQatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. - SWOT AnalysisSWOT Analysis - OverviewQatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. - StrengthsStrength - Distribution NetworkStrength - Product and Service PortfolioStrength - Compliance with Quality StandardsQatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. - WeaknessesWeakness - Increasing Trade ReceivablesQatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. - OpportunitiesOpportunity - Expansion InitiativesOpportunity - Growing Demand for Petroleum ProductsOpportunity - Growing Refining Industry: Middle EastQatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. - ThreatsThreat - Operational RisksThreat - Stringent Environmental RegulationsThreat - Political Instability in the Middle East & AfricaQatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. - Key CompetitorsSection 3 - Company Financial RatiosFinancial Ratios - Capital Market RatiosFinancial Ratios - Annual RatiosPerformance ChartFinancial PerformanceFinancial Ratios - Interim RatiosFinancial Ratios - Ratio ChartsSection 4 - Company's Recent DevelopmentsMay 12, 2015: Qatar Fuel "WOQOD" Inaugurates Lijmiliya Service StationMar 05, 2015: Qatar Fuel "WOQOD" Inaugurates Al-Wajbah Service StationAug 02, 2014: WOQOD: Sidra Doha Supplied The Biggest Dredger Ship In The World With BunkerMar 11, 2014: WOQOD Board Of Directors Appoints New CEOFeb 10, 2014: Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Net Profit Reached QR 1,216 Million for The Year 2013Section 5 - AppendixMethodologyRatio DefinitionsAbout GlobalDataContact UsDisclaimerList of TablesQatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C., Key FactsQatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C., Key EmployeesQatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C., Key Employee BiographiesQatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C., Key Operational EmployeesQatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C., Major Products and ServicesQatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C., Key Operational Summary, 2011Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C., HistoryQatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C., SubsidiariesQatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C., Key CompetitorsQatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C., Ratios based on current share priceQatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C., Annual RatiosQatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C., Interim RatiosCurrency CodesUnitsCapital Market RatiosEquity RatiosProfitability RatiosCost RatiosLiquidity RatiosLeverage RatiosEfficiency RatiosList of FiguresQatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C., Performance Chart (2010 - 2014)Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C., Ratio Charts
Companies Mentioned in this ReportQatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. (QFLS)
This report does not have a press release associated with it









Order Today!

FORMAT: Single User PDF - Delivered by Email 
$125  USD
LICENSE: Single User 
DELIVERY: By Email - 1 Business Day


























The Fast Market Research Advantage

Only the Best
            All of our research is sourced from the most trusted and established global analysts and consultancies
Client Focused
            From start-ups to multinationals, we focus on providing the right research to our diverse client base
Shop Securely
            Our US-based customer service team and eCommerce systems adhere to the highest data security standards
Industry-leading Customer Support
            Individualized assistance from our expert staff is never more than an email or phone call away




BEST PRICE GUARANTEE
We are committed to providing the best research at the lowest cost.  We will match any published price for the same report, guaranteed!



EASY ORDERING
Once you’ve found the right report, click ‘order now’ and complete the checkout process
using any major credit card, check or wire/bank transfer.Need multi-user or enterprise license pricing?  Contact us for a custom quote!
                  




About the Publisher
GlobalData is a leading provider of global business intelligence including market, competitor, product and customer information. It provides in-depth research, analysis, data and forecasts through a range of interactive online databases, reports and management briefings. GlobalData has a large team of experienced research and analysis, consulting, and marketing experts. It has a global presence, including key offices in the US, Europe and Asia. The group has over 50 years of experience of delivering market intelligence data and analysis and a highly experienced senior management team.

Publisher Details







Privacy Policy | Terms of Use | FLASHALERTS


Copyright &copy 2017 Fast Market Research, Inc.




















	
            
            
            Home
            
            
        






























































































































HOMECurrently selected
About Us
Vision, Mission & ValuesBoard MembersExecutive ManagementManagement TeamCorporate Social ResponsibilityQHSSEInvestor RelationsCareersBrand Guidelines
Fuel & Retail
Bulk FuelsService StationsSidra StoresAuto Care ServicesFuel DistributionBunkering
Lubricants
ProductsOEM ApprovalsDistributors
BitumenGas
SHAFAFResidential LPGCommercial LPGIndustrial LPGNatural GasCompressed Natural GasServicesFAQs
MEDIA CENTER
News & AnnouncmentsEventsAwareness CampaignsPromotionsMedia Contact
Business With WOQOD
Our BusinessTendersRent a ShopBecome a Retail SupplierGas Contractors For LPG Tank InstallationPetrol Stations Equipment
Feedback
Contact Us
Site Map






























×
                                            
                                            
                                            
                                            
                                            
                                            
                                            
                                            

Call Center





Call Center


						40217777
					
                                                
                                                
                                                
                                                
                                                
                                                
                                                
                                                



Toll Free Number


						800-3835
					
                                                
                                                
                                                
                                                
                                                
                                                
                                                
                                                









عربي





Search


Search


Search





It looks like your browser does not have JavaScript enabled. Please turn on JavaScript and try again.





FAQs




Contact Us




Qataraization




Vacancies



Awareness Compaigns
























Menu









Products and Services








CSR








Innovation








News








It looks like your browser does not have JavaScript enabled. Please turn on JavaScript and try again.



It looks like your browser does not have JavaScript enabled. Please turn on JavaScript and try again.










CSR


It looks like your browser does not have JavaScript enabled. Please turn on JavaScript and try again.



It looks like your browser does not have JavaScript enabled. Please turn on JavaScript and try again.











Innovation


It looks like your browser does not have JavaScript enabled. Please turn on JavaScript and try again.



It looks like your browser does not have JavaScript enabled. Please turn on JavaScript and try again.










News


It looks like your browser does not have JavaScript enabled. Please turn on JavaScript and try again.



It looks like your browser does not have JavaScript enabled. Please turn on JavaScript and try again.












Products and Services




CSR




Innovation




News










									×
                                                    
                                            
                                            
                                            
                                            
                                            
                                            
                                            
                                            
                                            
                                            
                                            











Call Center


							40217777
							
                                        
                                
                                
                                
                                    
                                    
                                    
                                    
                                    
                                    
                                    
                                    



Toll Free Number


								800-3835
								
	                                        
	                                
	                                
	                                
                                    
                                    
                                    
                                    
                                    
                                    
                                    
                                    

								800-FUEL
								
	                                        
	                                
	                                
	                                
                                    
                                    
                                    
                                    
                                    
                                    
                                    
                                    
















It looks like your browser does not have JavaScript enabled. Please turn on JavaScript and try again.



It looks like your browser does not have JavaScript enabled. Please turn on JavaScript and try again.












close


Business


with woqod







Content Area​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​Business with woqodProfessional and innovative solutions th​rough friendly, exc​ellent, an​d convenient services.​​​​​​​
 Rent a Shop  ​​
 Tender​s​ 
 Become a Sidra Supplier
Investor Relations
Become a WOQOD Lubricants Distributor ​
Branding Guidelines ​ 
 FAQs​ ​ ​​​​​


 ​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​​E-Services
Fuel​ Ordering Portal​
Bitumen Customer Portal​
WOQODe​




Content Area 01click here for more detail​​s



Content Area 02WOQOD's core activities


​ 
            Fuel & Service StationsWOQOD keeps Qatar moving every day. We take pride in serving our nation.​ 


WOQOD LUBRICANTS​WOQOD Lubricants offers a complete range of automotive and industrial lubricants, developed to suit all types of vehicles and industrial requirements.​
   
​BITUMEN​​Our bitumen products pave the roads of this country and pave the way into the new future​.BUNKERING WOQOD offers ship - to - ship, shore - to - ship, and truck to ship bunkering to visiting ships within Qatari waters.










close


Journey


with woqod





Promotions


Locations


Services


Feedback











It looks like your browser does not have JavaScript enabled. Please turn on JavaScript and try again.



It looks like your browser does not have JavaScript enabled. Please turn on JavaScript and try again.









Content Area 04
 

 VIEW LOCATIONS  




Content Area 03

Auto C​are​ 


WOQOD offers both modern automatic car washing and manual washing with high-speed pressure water jets 
 
​T​yre Change 


WOQOD offers both modern automatic car washing and manual washing with high-speed pressure water jets 

​Auto Repair


WOQOD offers both modern automatic car washing and manual washing with high-speed pressure water jets 
 
Car Wash​​​​ 
      


WOQOD offers both modern automatic car washing and manual washing with high-speed pressure water jets ​​​​​​​











Feedback


Working on it, Please wait ...


        Your request has been submitted successfully
    


            An error occurred while processing your request, please try again later.
        







                            Name
                        








                            Email Address
                            *



This field is required
Please enter a valid Email address






                            Category
                            *




Select
Feedback
Complaint

This field is required







                            Comment
                            *




This field is required
Please enter from 1 to 1000 characters.











Please enter the characters displayed in the image below
*







Error, Please check your entered text













Working on it, Please wait ...


                        Your request has been submitted successfully
                    


                            An error occurred while processing your request, please try again later.
                        










Submit















Go to feedback and complains



















































































	Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. (QFLS) - Financial and Strategic SWOT Analysis Review - Global Market Analyst











 

English

 Report Store Market Intelligence



 






Home
Oil and Gas
Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. (QFLS) - Financial and Strategic SWOT Analysis Review 



Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. (QFLS) - Financial and Strategic SWOT Analysis Review


  Market: Oil and Gas 
Qatar, 39 pages report, published by  GlobalData  

Keywords : Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C., SWOT analysis, SWOT, Strengths, Weaknesses, Opportunities, Threats, Corporate Strategy, Key Ratios, Share Data, Performance, Financial Performance, Overview, Business Description, Major Product, Brands, History,Key Employees, Key Operational Heads, Strategy, Key Competitors, Company Statement, Capital Market Ratios, Financial Ratios, Annual Ratios, Interim Ratios, Ratio Charts
 July-2015 



Description
List of Figures
List of Tables
T.O.C



     
                 Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. (QFLS) - Financial and Strategic SWOT Analysis Review provides you an in-depth strategic SWOT analysis of the company’s businesses and operations. The profile has been compiled by GlobalData to bring to you a clear and an unbiased view of the company’s key strengths and weaknesses and the potential opportunities and threats. The profile helps you formulate strategies that augment your business by enabling you to understand your partners, customers and competitors better.The profile contains critical company information including:- Business description – A detailed description of the company’s operations and business divisions.- Corporate strategy – Analyst’s summarization of the company’s business strategy.- SWOT Analysis – A detailed analysis of the company’s strengths, weakness, opportunities and threats.- Company history – Progression of key events associated with the company.- Major products and services – A list of major products, services and brands of the company.- Key competitors – A list of key competitors to the company.- Key employees – A list of the key executives of the company.- Executive biographies – A brief summary of the executives’ employment history.- Key operational heads – A list of personnel heading key departments/functions.- Important locations and subsidiaries – A list and contact details of key locations and subsidiaries of the company.- Detailed financial ratios for the past five years – The latest financial ratios derived from the annual financial statements published by the company with 5 years history.- Interim ratios for the last five interim periods – The latest financial ratios derived from the quarterly/semi-annual financial statements published by the company for 5 interims history.HighlightsQatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. (Qatar Fuel) is a downstream energy company. It carries out distribution, storage and marketing of fuel, liquefied petroleum gas (LPG), gas and refined petroleum products. The company is a sole distributor of fuels in Qatar, operating through a fleet of over 600 road tankers. It also supplies diesel and gasoline for vehicles, boats and industry, and aviation fuel for the Doha International Airport. Qatar Fuel trades in bunker fuels, bitumen importation and distribution for new roads, LPG for domestic purpose, and own-branded lubricants. The company also conducts ship-to-ship bunkering activities and markets its own range of branded lubricants. Qatar Fuel is headquartered in Doha, Qatar. The company focuses on diversifying its products and services and expanding its operations in the GCC and other countries. In line with this approach, it is establishing a WOQOD service station in the Saudi Arabia.Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. Key Recent DevelopmentsJun 10, 2015: Woqod To Set Up 15 Portable Fuel StationsMay 12, 2015: Qatar Fuel “WOQOD” Inaugurates Lijmiliya Service StationMar 05, 2015: Qatar Fuel “WOQOD” Inaugurates Al-Wajbah Service StationDec 12, 2013: WOQOD Opens A New Service Station In North MesaieedNov 17, 2013: WOQOD Opens A New Service Station In Bu SamraKey benefits of buying this profile include:You get detailed information about the company and its operations to identify potential customers and suppliers.- The profile analyzes the company’s business structure, operations, major products and services, prospects, locations and subsidiaries, key executives and their biographies and key competitors.Understand and respond to your competitors’ business structure and strategies, and capitalize on their weaknesses. Stay up to date on the major developments affecting the company.- The company’s core strengths and weaknesses and areas of development or decline are analyzed and presented in the profile objectively. Recent developments in the company covered in the profile help you track important events.Equip yourself with information that enables you to sharpen your strategies and transform your operations profitably.- Opportunities that the company can explore and exploit are sized up and its growth potential assessed in the profile. Competitive and/or technological threats are highlighted.Scout for potential investments and acquisition targets, with detailed insight into the companies’ strategic, financial and operational performance.- Financial ratio presented for major public companies in the profile include the revenue trends, profitability, growth, margins and returns, liquidity and leverage, financial position and efficiency ratios.Gain key insights into the company for academic or business research.- Key elements such as SWOT analysis, corporate strategy and financial ratios and charts are incorporated in the profile to assist your academic or business research needs.Note: Some sections may be missing if data is unavailable for the company
          



                List of Figures  Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C., Performance Chart (2010 - 2014)  25Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C., Ratio Charts  27
                




List of Tables  Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C., Key Facts  6Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C., Key Employees  7Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C., Key Employee Biographies  8Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C., Key Operational Employees  9Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C., Major Products and Services  10Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C., Key Operational Summary, 2011  11Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C., History  12Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C., Subsidiaries  15Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C., Key Competitors  22Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C., Ratios based on current share price  23Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C., Annual Ratios  24Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C., Interim Ratios  26Currency Codes  34Units  34Capital Market Ratios  34Equity Ratios  35Profitability Ratios  35Cost Ratios  36Liquidity Ratios  37Leverage Ratios  37Efficiency Ratios  37




Table of Contents  Table of Contents  2List of Tables  4List of Figures  5Section 1 - About the Company  6Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. - Key Facts  6Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. - Key Employees  7Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. - Key Employee Biographies  8Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. - Key Operational Employees  9Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. - Major Products and Services  10Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. - Key Operational Summary  11Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. - History  12Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. - Company Statement  14Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. - Locations And Subsidiaries  15Head Office  15Other Locations & Subsidiaries  15Section 2 – Company Analysis  16Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. - Business Description  16Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. - Corporate Strategy  17Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. - SWOT Analysis  18SWOT Analysis - Overview  18Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. - Strengths  18Strength - Distribution Network  18Strength - Product and Service Portfolio  18Strength - Compliance with Quality Standards  18Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. - Weaknesses  19Weakness - Increasing Trade Receivables  19Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. - Opportunities  20Opportunity - Expansion Initiatives  20Opportunity - Growing Demand for Petroleum Products  20Opportunity - Growing Refining Industry: Middle East  20Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. - Threats  21Threat - Operational Risks  21Threat - Stringent Environmental Regulations  21Threat - Political Instability in the Middle East & Africa  21Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. - Key Competitors  22Section 3 – Company Financial Ratios  23Financial Ratios - Capital Market Ratios  23Financial Ratios - Annual Ratios  24Performance Chart  25Financial Performance  25Financial Ratios - Interim Ratios  26Financial Ratios - Ratio Charts  27Section 4 – Company’s Recent Developments  28May 12, 2015: Qatar Fuel “WOQOD” Inaugurates Lijmiliya Service Station  28Mar 05, 2015: Qatar Fuel “WOQOD” Inaugurates Al-Wajbah Service Station  29Aug 02, 2014: WOQOD: Sidra Doha Supplied The Biggest Dredger Ship In The World With Bunker  30Mar 11, 2014: WOQOD Board Of Directors Appoints New CEO  31Feb 10, 2014: Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Net Profit Reached QR 1,216 Million for The Year  2013  32Section 5 – Appendix  34Methodology  34Ratio Definitions  34About GlobalData  38Contact Us  38Disclaimer  39




 







Please select a license type


SINGLE USER   125 USD 
SITE LICENSE   250 USD 
GLOBAL LICENSE   375 USD 


Add to CartContinue Shopping

Share            
            





Recently Viewed


Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. (QFLS) - Financial and Strategic SWOT Analysis Review



Related Products 
 

June-2017 
 Targa Resources Partners LP (NGLS PR A) - Oil & Gas - Deals and Alliances Profile
From  USD 250

Oil and Gas
Company Report
56Pages
United States





June-2017 
 Southern Company Gas - Oil & Gas - Deals and Alliances Profile
From  USD 250

Oil and Gas
Company Report
33Pages
United States





June-2017 
 Vanguard Natural Resources, LLC (VNRSQ) - Oil & Gas - Deals and Alliances Profile
From  USD 250

Oil and Gas
Company Report
60Pages
United States





June-2017 
 Penn Virginia Corporation (PVAC) - Oil & Gas - Deals and Alliances Profile
From  USD 250

Oil and Gas
Company Report
51Pages
United States






Email to a Colleague




GlobalDataQatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. (QFLS) - Financial and Strategic SWOT Analysis ReviewQatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. (QFLS) - Financial and Strategic SWOT Analysis Review, Company ReportProduct #: 24365



 
 
 
 
 
 

 

  


 
Copyright © 2017  Global Market Analyst. All Rights Reserved




















Qatar Fuel : “WOQOD” Conducts Workshop On Compressed Natural Gas (CNG) | 4-Traders













































































 




Log in






E-mail



Password







Remember




Forgot password ?









Become a member for free
Sign up





Sign up




New memberSign up for FREE


New customerDiscover our portfolios












 United States
 United Kingdom
 France
 Deutschland
 Schweiz (DE)
 Suisse (FR)










Settings

            Dynamic quotes 


OFFON








 








Markets
Equities
North AmericaEuropeAsiaOceaniaMiddle East» More Equities

Indexes
DOW JONESS&P 500NASDAQ 100TSX COMPFTSE 100» More Indexes

Currency / Forex
EUR / USDGBP / USDUSD / JPYUSD / CADAUD / USD» More Currencies

Commodities
GOLDCrude Oil (WTI)Crude Oil (BRENT)SILVERPLATINUM» More Commodities


 News
Latest News
CompaniesMarketsEconomyCurrency / ForexCommoditiesInterest RatesBusiness LeadersFinancial calendarEconomic calendar

Listed company
Analyst reco.RumorsIPOsCapital Markets TransactionsNew ContractsProfits warningsAppointmentsPress ReleasesEventsCorporate actions

Sector News
EnergyBasic MaterialsIndustrialsConsumer CyclicalConsumer Non-CyclicalFinancialsHealthcareTechnologyTelecommunications ServicesUtilities


 Analysis
All AnalysisCommentariesIndex AnalysisStock Trading StrategiesCommodity AnalysisForex Analysis

 Stock Picks
All stock picks

 Portfolios
My Portfolio
Virtual portfolios
4-Traders Portfolios
European PortfolioUSA PortfolioAsian Portfolio


 Screeners
Market Screener HomeFundamental Analyse
Top Investor RatingTop Trading RatingTop ConsensusGrowth stocksYield stocksLow valuations

Technical Analysis
Oversold stocksOverbought stocksClose to resistancesClose to supportsAccumulation phaseMost volatile stocks


 Watchlists
My Watchlists
Watchlists
Top Lists
Yield stocksGrowth stocksUndervalued Stocks


 Top / Flop
Top News
Most Read NewsHot News

Top Fundamentals
Top CapitalizationTop YieldTop PERTop ConsensusTop Fundamentals

Top Technicals
Top RSIUnusual volumesTop GapsTop STIM

Top Movers
Top USATop CanadaTop U.K.Top GermanyTop EuropeTop Asia


 Tools
Market ScreenerDynamic chartFinancial calendarEconomic calendarSector researchCurrency converter

 Our Services
Premium AccessDiscover our Services

 



















 







4-Traders Homepage  >  Equities  >  DOHA SECURITIES MARKET  >  Qatar Fuel QSC       QA0001200771










     QATAR FUEL QSC     


Add to my list    

Mes dernières consult.Most popular
Manage my lists

















 







No quotes available

--
QAR
 
--.--%










06/08 QATAR FUEL : Woqod lifts board of directors membership to 9


06/07 QATAR FUEL : Woqod expands board, amends EGM majority


06/06 QATAR FUEL : Trading suspension in the shares of qatar fuel on tuesd..

 







SummaryNewsCalendarCompanyFinancials News SummaryMost relevantAll newsSector newsTweets


















 




Qatar Fuel : “WOQOD” Conducts Workshop On Compressed Natural Gas (CNG)



































0






12/24/2014 | 11:36am CEST 


Send by mail :
Last Name :
Name :
From* :
To* :
(You can enter multiple email addresses separated by commas)
Message :
*Required fields






      Qatar Fuel "WOQOD" Conducts Workshop On Compressed Natural Gas (CNG)
    


        Doha, 15/12/2014 - WOQOD held a one day CNG workshop on Monday 15th December 2014 at LA CIGALE hotel in Doha.
      

        Commenting on this event, WOQOD's CEO Engineer. Ibrahim Jaham Al Kuwari said "I am pleased and honoured to open the first workshop WOQOD is holding on the introduction of CNG as an alternative road transportation fuel in the State of Qatar.
      

        The workshop will discuss various issues and exchange views with expert people of CNG as a road transportation fuel, a fuel that is considered one of the most environmentally friendly. CNG benefits include cleaner emissions compared to diesel and gasoline and helps reducing air pollution. Cleaner fuel keeps the vehicle engine clean resulting in less engine noise and maintenance costs.
      

        Qatar is blessed with an abundance of gas making CNG a natural fuel to introduce to the market. Currently, we have one CNG station fueling 66 Mowasalat buses in the new industrial area of Doha. Mowasalat has kindly agreed to share their experience of running CNG engine buses with us today. With the support of Qatar Petroleum, an additional 7 CNG fueling stations will be commissioned by 2017. There are plans for a much wider roll out of CNG availability both through WOQOD service stations and at the home base of large fleet operators."
      

        The workshop was conducted internally by WOQOD with the collaboration of other parties such as the Ministry of Transport (Mowasalat), the first user of the product in the state of Qatar.
      




                            distributed by
                        
























































0






 






Latest news on QATAR FUEL QSC




06/08 QATAR FUEL : Woqod lifts board of directors membership to 9

06/07 QATAR FUEL : Woqod expands board, amends EGM majority

06/06 QATAR FUEL : Trading suspension in the shares of qatar fuel on tuesday, june 06,..

06/05 QATAR FUEL : QSE slides 633.08 pts at Monday’s open

05/16 QATAR GAS TRANSPORT NAKILAT : Petroleum - The Energy and Industry Sector Holds i..

05/16 QATAR GAS TRANSPORT NAKILAT : Industry leaders honoured at 17th annual Qatarisat..

05/16 QATAR GAS TRANSPORT NAKILAT : Al Sada hails firms implementing Qatarisation plan

05/10 QATAR FUEL : QSE rises 125.89 pts at Wednesday’s close

05/10 QATAR FUEL : service sector profits fall 22% in Q1

05/09 Industry, telecom sectors boost QSE at Tuesday’s close



More news

 







 



 





Managers
 





 NameTitleSaad Al-Mohannadi
Chief Executive Officer
Ahmad Saif Al-Sulaiti
Chairman
Ahmed Ali Mirza
Chief Operations Officer
Jaber Ali Al-Hedfa
Chief Financial & Administrative Officer
Yousef Al-Sulaiti
Manager-Information & Technology
 
More about the company


Sector and Competitors


1st jan.Capitalization (M$)

QATAR FUEL QSC3 027





CHINA PETROLEUM & CHEMICAL CORP--.--%7 239 001

EXXON MOBIL CORPORATION-11.81%337 286

BP-12.52%114 523

CHINA PETROLEUM & CHEMICAL CORP12.94%106 064

RELIANCE INDUSTRIES LIMITED47.50%80 871


More Results
 




 



























4-traders.com :MarketsNewsAnalysisStock PicksPortfoliosScreenersWatchlistsTop / FlopToolsOur ServicesAbout :Surperformance SASContact usAdvertiseLegal informationsAbout usStay Connected :FacebookTwitterPartners :Börse: Aktien, Kurse und NachrichtenBest tweets 




   Copyright © 2017 Surperformance. All rights reserved.  









 


  














Slave







Qatar Fuel QSC SWOT Analysis - Strengths, Weaknesses, Opportunities, Threats of Qatar Fuel QSC



















































			Currency : $
		


$







contact
sitemap
















ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZ0123456789

 








Categories



A


B


C


D


E


F


G


H


I


J


K


L


M


N


O


P


Q


R


S


T


U


V


W


X


Y


Z


0


1


2


3


4


5


6


7


8


9













>
Q>Qatar Fuel QSC SWOT Analysis - Strengths, Weaknesses, Opportunities, Threats of Qatar Fuel QSC
			











Qatar Fuel QSC SWOT Analysis - Strengths, Weaknesses, Opportunities, Threats of Qatar Fuel QSC

This SWOT Analysis of Qatar Fuel QSC provides a full SWOT analysis of the company's businesses and operations. The profile shows a comprehensive view of the company's key strengths and weaknesses and the potential opportunities and threats.
More details












Reference: 
SWT10088679



Quantity:




				This product is not sold individually. You must select at least 1 quantity for this product.
			


Availability:







Warning: Last items in stock!



























Share on Facebook


	Remove this product from my favorites


	Add this product to my favorites
 Print












Data sheet









Qatar Fuel QSC SWOT Analysis OverviewCategories: cost analysis, strategic analysis, financial reportTag: company history, business descriptionDescription: New products and services can be seen. Companies in this market face an increasing demand for their products and services.This SWOT Analysis of Qatar Fuel QSC provides a strategic report of businesses and operations of the company. The SWOT analysis shows strengths, weaknesses, opportunities and threats. This SWOT analysis of Qatar Fuel QSC can provide a competitive advantage.This analysis contains 708 data points.Last update: July 2017.SWOT - Strengths-monetary assistance provided-experienced business units-barriers of market entry-high profitability and revenue-existing distribution and sales networks SWOT - Weaknesses-competitive market-future productivity SWOT - Opportunities-new acquisitions SWOT - Threats-price changes-government regulations-financial capacity-rising cost of raw materials-tax changes Business TrendsProfitabilityOutlookMarketThe industry shows a growth rate of about 7%.Industry specific SWOT analysis (Relevance/Importance)What happens in the underlying industry? Factors and trends affecting the overall industry and their implications for this business:Strengths-Access to comparable industries is possible. (51%, 36%)-The market size is adequate. (21%, 37%) Weaknesses-There migth be a lack of strategic relationships. (34%, 48%) Opportunities-New market trends can be seen. (44%, 20%)-The market changes fast. (42%, 21%)-Global markets are available. (20%, 28%)-The industry shows a positive trend. (37%, 36%)-New trade agreements between countries are possible. (36%, 27%) Threats-Price changes are possible. (42%, 15%)-Increasing costs might be possible. (35%, 56%)-The industry sees new market entrants. (34%, 36%) A SWOT Analysis provides a comprehensive insight into the history of the company, corporate strategy, business and financial structure, management and operations. The report contains a detailed SWOT analysis on products and services, key competitors, as well as detailed financial information.Data on this page may have come in part, or entirely, from one or more data providers. Please contact us for further information. We are not responsible for any errors or omissions on this page. This website is for information purposes only. This is a sample report.Comparable companies and industriesSee a list of comparable companies or industries depending on the similarity of SWOT elements. We use weighted SWOT factors and a clustering technique to identify similar objects.Designory SWOT AnalysisABM Solid SWOT AnalysisThe ExOne Company SWOT AnalysisAdamus Resources Limited SWOT AnalysisSecom SWOT Analysis







Top 5 SWOT Analysis Search AppleMicrosoftFacebookChina MobileYahoo Compliance Compliance is necessary to make sure that any business or action conducted by a company is within legal parameters. The compliance unit develops, initiates, maintains, and revises policies and procedures for the general operation of the compliance program and its related activities to prevent illegal, unethical, or improper conduct. Financial and strategic SWOT analysis A financial and strategic SWOT (strengths, weaknesses, opportunities and threats) Analysis provides a comprehensive insight into the company’s history, corporate strategy, financial data, business structure, business divisions and key operations. Each report contains a detailed SWOT analysis with additional information on the key competitors, market structure, major products, brands and services, as well as detailed financial data for the last 5 years. Due Diligence Due diligence is the process of systematically researching and verifying the accuracy of a financial statement, business or investment. SWOT Analysis – Advantages and Limitations Over the past decade, SWOT analysis has been extended beyond companies to products, organizations, countries and industries. Each professional business plan contains a SWOT analysis. What are the benefits and limitations? Advantages  You can use a SWOT analysis to summarize a complex situation. It is easy to understand and has little or no cost. Quantitative and qualitative information from different sources can be combined. Focus on the key internal and external factors affecting the organization. It is easy to perform and understand. It can be used fast.    Limitations  There is no weight or prioritization of factors. A SWOT analysis contains of a list of factors without further descriptions or links between factors. The analysis does not provide any solutions. It is only a description. 







 Free information
 Worldwide Coverage
 Free Listings
 Free Access
 Easy and Secure





Categories




A


B


C


D


E


F


G


H


I


J


K


L


M


N


O


P


Q


R


S


T


U


V


W


X


Y


Z


0


1


2


3


4


5


6


7


8


9









Information

Specials New products
Top sellers Contact us
Legal Notice and Privacy Policy
Terms and conditions of use
About us
Sitemap





My account


My orders
My credit slips
My addresses
My personal info


				My favorite products
	


Sign out




Follow us

Facebook Twitter 





This site uses cookies so that we can improve your experience on our sites. You can read about cookie privacy policy by clicking on this link: Privacy Policy



Copyright © 2017 Weiner Consulting. All Rights Reserved. The content of this website is for informational purposes only.
Advisor4u | 
Advisor4u Jobmarket |
Advisor4u Companies |
Advisorgate Industries |
Businessplaninternational | 
Businessplaninternational Digital 
Businessplaninternational SWOT |
Businessplaninternational Datacenter |
Businessplaninternational Freelance | 
Businessplaninternational Marketplace | 
Businessplangate 
Businessplangate Companies |
Livingplace4u College |
Livingplace4u Jobs | 
Propertyplace4u |
Productplace4u |
Advisorgate |
Advisorgate Reports 
Advisorgate BPlans |
Advisorgate Financials |
Advisorgate Competition |
SWOTAnalysis24 |
SWOTData |
Advisorgate SWOT









Oil & Gas Market Reports | Industry analysis | Bharat Book













































Toggle navigation













  

Bharat 
            Book Bureau
 Your One-Stop-Shop for business information







Welcome Guest   Log In   Register 





   $ - USD 


$ - USD
€ - EUR
£ - GBP
Rs - INR


  |    item(s) :  0    
						
						
											
						  













Market Reports
Country  Reports
Company Reports
Online Database
Custom Research
Discounted Reports
Conferences & Seminars
Publisher Signup



Our Products 

Market Reports
Country  Reports
Company Reports
Online Databases
Custom Research
Discounted Reports
Conferences & Seminars
Publishers Signup








 Search
 







  
        MARKET REPORTS  
        COUNTRY REPORTS  
        COMPANY REPORTS  
        CUSTOM RESEARCH ONLINE 
        DATABASES DISCOUNTED REPORTS 







Home
Categories
Energy & Utility Oil & Gas





Consumer Goods

Beauty & personal care
Consumer electronics
Home & Office supplies
Retail
Textiles and Apparel


Energy & Utility

Alternative & Renewable
Environment
Non Renewable
Oil & Gas
Water


Food & Beverages

Agriculture
Beverages
Confectionery
Dairy
Food


Industry & Mfg

Automotive
Defence & Security
Industrial goods & Machinery
Manufacturing & construction
Materials & chemicals
Metals & Minerals
Packaging
Shipping
Transportation and Logistics


Life Sciences

Biotechnology
Diagnostics
Drugs
Healthcare
Medical Devices


Service Industry

Business
Education
Financial service
Insurance
Law
Other Services
Travel & Tourism


Technology & Media

Advertising
Information Technology
Media
Nanotechnology
Technology
Telecommunications




Get FREE WHITEPAPERS on your interested topics, INSTANTLY!!! 
						
Go through the widespread collection of eBooks and Whitepapers offered both on current and past happenings of varied business sectors
 Download Now 


 


Oil and Gas Research Reports covering Global Market Scenario
Oil and Gas market constitutes of global suppliers who provide fuel to meet demands of the consumers. This sector meets much of the worlds demand for energy and the chief attributes of the market are fossil fuel, crude oil and natural gas resources. 
	 Bharat book provides a wide range of well researched Oil & Gas Market Research Reports that would benefit any oil services provider, shipping company, operator in the upstream or downstream segment or any institution who are directly or indirectly related to this industry.
The research report suggests that the global market for crude oil is highly competitive due to falling resources and the estimated value will almost hit $2,683 billion in 2015, representing over 27% growth over a five-year period. 3B reports on  oil and gas market analysis covers forecasts of oil & gas production and demand, investment opportunities,  marketing and sales strategies, future growth of global oil and gas industry buyers and suppliers, new equipment available in market and many more.
Bharat Book offers detailed market research reports that cover all the sectors of oil and gas market.  The reports also cover the industry according to different countries as well as the major giants in this industry, their strategy report, the latest methods of exploration they are taking on, the future this industry holds and new challenges that are raising its head in the oil and gas field.










 Sort by 
      


        Title
        


        Publish Date 



         Price 
		
		

 














Europe Compressed Natural Gas (CNG) Cylinders Market by Manufacturers, Countries, Type and Application, Forecast to 2022
27 Jul 2017  |  Published by:  Global Info Research
Compressed Natural Gas (CNG) Cylinders is made using the cylinder shape with a semi-spherical shape covering each end. The cylinder and semi-spherical shapes provide the strongest structural shape because the circular and spherical shapes provide for equal distribution of stresses throughout the inn...

$ 4,480.00
Read More




Global Communal Waste to Diesel Market Research Report 2017
20 Jul 2017  |  Published by:  QYResearch
In this report, the global Communal Waste to Diesel market is valued at USD XX million in 2016 and is expected to reach USD XX million by the end of 2022, growing at a CAGR of XX% between 2016 and 2022.Geographically, this report is segmented into several key Regions, with production, consumption, r...

$ 2,900.00
Read More




Global Composite LPG Cylinders Market Research Report 2017
20 Jul 2017  |  Published by:  QYResearch
In this report, the global Composite LPG Cylinders market is valued at USD XX million in 2016 and is expected to reach USD XX million by the end of 2022, growing at a CAGR of XX% between 2016 and 2022.Geographically, this report is segmented into several key Regions, with production, consumption, re...

$ 2,900.00
Read More




Manufacture and Distribution of Gas in USA: ISIC 402
20 Jul 2017  |  Published by:  Euromonitor
Industrial reports provide a 360 degree view of an industry. The Industrial market report offers a comprehensive guide to the size and shape of the Manufacture and Distribution of Gas market at a national level. It provides the latest retail sales data, allowing you to identify the sectors driving g...

$ 660.00
				

				$ 528.00
				( Save 20% )
Read More




United States CNG Tank (CNG Cylinder) Market by Manufacturers, States, Type and Application, Forecast to 2022
19 Jul 2017  |  Published by:  Global Info Research
CNG Tank/Cylinder is made using the cylinder shape with a semi-spherical shape covering each end. The cylinder and semi-spherical shapes provide the strongest structural shape because the circular and spherical shapes provide for equal distribution of stresses throughout the inner area of the tank p...

$ 4,480.00
Read More




PSE Kinsale Energy Limited - Strategic SWOT Analysis Review
18 Jul 2017  |  Published by:  GlobalData
PSE Kinsale Energy Limited - Strategic SWOT Analysis Review provides a comprehensive insight into the company's history, corporate strategy, business structure and operations. The report contains a detailed SWOT analysis, information on the company's key employees, key competitors and major products...

$ 125.00
Read More




Sinopec Oilfield Service Corporation (600871) - Financial and Strategic SWOT Analysis Review
18 Jul 2017  |  Published by:  GlobalData
Sinopec Oilfield Service Corporation (600871) - Financial and Strategic SWOT Analysis Review provides you an in-depth strategic SWOT analysis of the company's businesses and operations. The profile has been compiled by GlobalData to bring to you a clear and an unbiased view of the company's key stre...

$ 125.00
Read More




Neste Jacobs Oy - Strategic SWOT Analysis Review
18 Jul 2017  |  Published by:  GlobalData
Neste Jacobs Oy - Strategic SWOT Analysis Review provides a comprehensive insight into the company's history, corporate strategy, business structure and operations. The report contains a detailed SWOT analysis, information on the company's key employees, key competitors and major products and servic...

$ 125.00
Read More




Oceanteam ASA (OTS) - Financial and Strategic SWOT Analysis Review
18 Jul 2017  |  Published by:  GlobalData
Oceanteam ASA (OTS) - Financial and Strategic SWOT Analysis Review provides you an in-depth strategic SWOT analysis of the company's businesses and operations. The profile has been compiled by GlobalData to bring to you a clear and an unbiased view of the company's key strengths and weaknesses and t...

$ 125.00
Read More




Ultrapar Participacoes S.A. (UGPA3) - Financial and Strategic SWOT Analysis Review
18 Jul 2017  |  Published by:  GlobalData
Ultrapar Participacoes S.A. (UGPA3) - Financial and Strategic SWOT Analysis Review provides you an in-depth strategic SWOT analysis of the company's businesses and operations. The profile has been compiled by GlobalData to bring to you a clear and an unbiased view of the company's key strengths and ...

$ 125.00
Read More




Magellan Midstream Partners, L.P. (MMP) - Financial and Strategic SWOT Analysis Review
18 Jul 2017  |  Published by:  GlobalData
Magellan Midstream Partners, L.P. (MMP) - Financial and Strategic SWOT Analysis Review provides you an in-depth strategic SWOT analysis of the company's businesses and operations. The profile has been compiled by GlobalData to bring to you a clear and an unbiased view of the company's key strengths ...

$ 125.00
Read More




PT Pertamina (Persero) - Strategic SWOT Analysis Review
18 Jul 2017  |  Published by:  GlobalData
PT Pertamina (Persero) - Strategic SWOT Analysis Review provides a comprehensive insight into the company's history, corporate strategy, business structure and operations. The report contains a detailed SWOT analysis, information on the company's key employees, key competitors and major products and...

$ 125.00
Read More




Southwest Gas Corporation (SWX) - Financial and Strategic SWOT Analysis Review
18 Jul 2017  |  Published by:  GlobalData
Southwest Gas Corporation (SWX) - Financial and Strategic SWOT Analysis Review provides you an in-depth strategic SWOT analysis of the company's businesses and operations. The profile has been compiled by GlobalData to bring to you a clear and an unbiased view of the company's key strengths and weak...

$ 125.00
Read More




EQT Corporation (EQT) - Financial and Strategic SWOT Analysis Review
18 Jul 2017  |  Published by:  GlobalData
EQT Corporation (EQT) - Financial and Strategic SWOT Analysis Review provides you an in-depth strategic SWOT analysis of the company's businesses and operations. The profile has been compiled by GlobalData to bring to you a clear and an unbiased view of the company's key strengths and weaknesses and...

$ 125.00
Read More




Subsea 7 S.A. (SUBC) - Financial and Strategic SWOT Analysis Review
18 Jul 2017  |  Published by:  GlobalData
Subsea 7 S.A. (SUBC) - Financial and Strategic SWOT Analysis Review provides you an in-depth strategic SWOT analysis of the company's businesses and operations. The profile has been compiled by GlobalData to bring to you a clear and an unbiased view of the company's key strengths and weaknesses and ...

$ 125.00
Read More




12345678910

6655 Results




























Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. (QFLS) - Financial and S















































Toggle navigation













  

Bharat 
            Book Bureau
 Your One-Stop-Shop for business information







Welcome Guest   Log In   Register 





   $ - USD 


$ - USD
€ - EUR
£ - GBP
Rs - INR


  |    item(s) :  0    
						
						
											
						  













Market Reports
Country  Reports
Company Reports
Online Database
Custom Research
Discounted Reports
Conferences & Seminars
Publisher Signup



Our Products 

Market Reports
Country  Reports
Company Reports
Online Databases
Custom Research
Discounted Reports
Conferences & Seminars
Publishers Signup








 Search
 







  
        MARKET REPORTS  
        COUNTRY REPORTS  
        COMPANY REPORTS  
        CUSTOM RESEARCH ONLINE 
        DATABASES DISCOUNTED REPORTS 






Home
CategoriesEnergy & UtilityOil & GasQatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. (QFLS) - Financial and S...





 Buy Now



 Single User $ 125.00 Site License $ 250.00 Global License $ 375.00







 
              Add to Compare
 
              PDF Brochure



 Send an Enquiry
 Refer to a Friend




×
Refer to friend




Your Contact Details

Your Name  *




Your Email ID  *






Friend's Information

Full Name  *





Email Address  *





Message to Friend





Captcha Code *


   
             Refresh



Copy the code given in the image on the left side.





   Send to Friend   










 Printer Friendly Format



F.A.Q.s
Got a Question?
 If you got a question, look no further.
								We post the most common questions 
								in our FAQ section.
							







Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. (QFLS) - Financial and Strategic SWOT Analysis Review
  Published On: Jun, 2017 |    No of Pages: 33 |  Published By: GlobalData |  Format: PDF 
 
              Request Free Sample




×
Request for Sample


Please fill in the form below to receive a Free Sample of the Report.


Personal Details

Your Name




Your Email ID





Phone





Job Title





Company





Country


Select Country Name
Afghanistan
Africa
Albania
Algeria
Angola
Argentina
Armenia
Aruba
Asia-Pacific
Australia
Austria
Azerbaijan
Bahamas
Bahrain
Bangladesh
Barbados
Belarus
Belgium
Belize
Benin
Bermuda
Bolivia
Bosnia-Hercegovina
Botswana
Brazil
Bulgaria
Burkina Faso
Burundi
Cambodia
Cameroon
Canada
Cape Verde
Central African Republic
Chad
Chile
China
Colombia
Comoros
Congo
Costa Rica
Cote d Ivoire
Croatia
Cuba
Cyprus
Czech Republic
Denmark
Djibouti
Dominican Republic
Eastern Europe
Ecuador
Egypt
El Salvador
Equatorial Guinea
Eritrea
Estonia
Ethiopia
Europe
European Union
Fiji
Finland
France
Gabon
Georgia
Germany
Ghana
Gibraltar
Global
Greece
Guatemala
Guinea
Guinea-Bissau
Guyana
Haiti
Honduras
Hong Kong
Hungary
Iceland
India
Indonesia
Iran
Iraq
Ireland
Israel
Italy
Jamaica
Japan
Jordan
Kazakhstan
Kenya
Kuwait
Kyrgyzstan
Laos
Latin America
Latvia
Lebanon
Lesotho
Liberia
Libya
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Macau
Macedonia
Madagascar
Malawi
Malaysia
Mali
Malta
Mauritania
Mauritius
Mercosur
Mexico
Middle East
Moldova
Monaco
Mongolia
Montenegro
Morocco
Mozambique
Myanmar
Namibia
Nepal
Netherlands
New Caledonia
New Zealand
Nicaragua
Niger
Nigeria
North Korea
Norway
Oman
Pakistan
Palestinian Territories
Panama
Papua New Guinea
Paraguay
Peru
Philippines
Poland
Portugal
Puerto Rico
Qatar
Romania
Russia
Rwanda
Sao Tome and Principe
Saudi Arabia
Senegal
Serbia
Sierra Leone
Singapore
Slovakia
Slovenia
Solomon Islands
Somalia
South Africa
South Korea
Spain
Sri Lanka
Sub-Saharan Africa
Sudan
Suriname
Swaziland
Sweden
Switzerland
Syria
Taiwan
Tajikistan
Tanzania
Thailand
The Gambia
Togo
Tonga
Trinidad and Tobago
Tunisia
Turkey
Turkmenistan
UAE
Uganda
Ukraine
United Kingdom
United States
Uruguay
Uzbekistan
Vanuatu
Venezuela
Vietnam
Virgin Islands
Yemen
Zambia
Zimbabwe



Report Details

Product Title
 
            Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. (QFLS) - Financial and Strategic SWOT Analysis Review
          


Captcha Code *


   
             Refresh



Copy the code given in the image on the left side.





   Request Sample   




















Abstract
Content
Related Reports





Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. (QFLS) - Financial and Strategic SWOT Analysis Review provides you an in-depth strategic SWOT analysis of the companys businesses and operations. The profile has been compiled by GlobalData to bring to you a clear and an unbiased view of the companys key strengths and weaknesses and the potential opportunities and threats. The profile helps you formulate strategies that augment your business by enabling you to understand your partners, customers and competitors better.The profile contains critical company information including:- Business description  A detailed description of the companys operations and business divisions.- Corporate strategy  Analysts summarization of the companys business strategy.- SWOT Analysis  A detailed analysis of the companys strengths, weakness, opportunities and threats.- Company history  Progression of key events associated with the company.- Major products and services  A list of major products, services and brands of the company.- Key competitors  A list of key competitors to the company.- Key employees  A list of the key executives of the company.- Executive biographies  A brief summary of the executives employment history.- Key operational heads  A list of personnel heading key departments/functions.- Important locations and subsidiaries  A list and contact details of key locations and subsidiaries of the company.- Detailed financial ratios for the past five years  The latest financial ratios derived from the annual financial statements published by the company with 5 years history.- Interim ratios for the last five interim periods  The latest financial ratios derived from the quarterly/semi-annual financial statements published by the company for 5 interims history.HighlightsQatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. (Qatar Fuel) is a downstream energy company. It carries out distribution, storage and marketing of fuel, liquefied petroleum gas (LPG), gas and refined petroleum products. The company is a sole distributor of fuels in Qatar. Qatar Fuel is also engaged in vehicle inspection services, transportation activities of oil and gas with in State of Qatar, marine bunkering and real estate services. It also supplies diesel and gasoline for vehicles, boats and industry, and aviation fuel for the Doha International Airport. The company trades in bunker fuels, bitumen importation and distribution for new roads, LPG for domestic purpose, and own-branded lubricants. The company also conducts ship-to-ship bunkering activities and markets its own range of branded lubricants. Qatar Fuel is headquartered in Doha, Qatar.Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. Key Recent DevelopmentsJun 22,2017: Qatar Fuel WOQOD Opens Al Egda New Service StationKey benefits of buying this profile include:You get detailed information about the company and its operations to identify potential customers and suppliers.- The profile analyzes the companys business structure, operations, major products and services, prospects, locations and subsidiaries, key executives and their biographies and key competitors.Understand and respond to your competitors business structure and strategies, and capitalize on their weaknesses. Stay up to date on the major developments affecting the company.- The companys core strengths and weaknesses and areas of development or decline are analyzed and presented in the profile objectively. Recent developments in the company covered in the profile help you track important events.Equip yourself with information that enables you to sharpen your strategies and transform your operations profitably.- Opportunities that the company can explore and exploit are sized up and its growth potential assessed in the profile. Competitive and/or technological threats are highlighted.Scout for potential investments and acquisition targets, with detailed insight into the companies strategic, financial and operational performance.- Financial ratio presented for major public companies in the profile include the revenue trends, profitability, growth, margins and returns, liquidity and leverage, financial position and efficiency ratios.Gain key insights into the company for academic or business research.- Key elements such as SWOT analysis, corporate strategy and financial ratios and charts are incorporated in the profile to assist your academic or business research needs.Note: Some sections may be missing if data is unavailable for the company


Table of ContentsTable of Contents 3List of Tables 4List of Figures 4Section 1 - About the Company 5Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. - Key Facts 5Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. - Key Employees 6Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. - Key Employee Biographies 7Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. - Key Operational Employees 8Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. - Major Products and Services 9Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. - History 10Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. - Company Statement 12Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. - Locations And Subsidiaries 13Head Office 13Other Locations & Subsidiaries 13Section 2  Company Analysis 14Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. - Business Description 14Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. - Corporate Strategy 15Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. - SWOT Analysis 16SWOT Analysis - Overview 16Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. - Strengths 16Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. - Weaknesses 17Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. - Opportunities 18Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. - Threats 19Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C. - Key Competitors 20Section 3  Company Financial Ratios 21Financial Ratios - Capital Market Ratios 21Financial Ratios - Annual Ratios 22Performance Chart 25Financial Performance 25Financial Ratios - Interim Ratios 26Financial Ratios - Ratio Charts 27Section 4  Appendix 28Methodology 28Ratio Definitions 28About GlobalData 32Contact Us 32Disclaimer 32List of TablesQatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C., Key Facts 5Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C., Key Employees 6Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C., Key Employee Biographies 7Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C., Key Operational Employees 8Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C., Major Products and Services 9Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C., History 10Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C., Subsidiaries 13Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C., Key Competitors 20Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C., Ratios based on current share price 21Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C., Annual Ratios 22Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C., Annual Ratios (Cont...1) 23Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C., Annual Ratios (Cont...2) 24Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C., Interim Ratios 26Currency Codes 28Units 28Capital Market Ratios 28Equity Ratios 29Profitability Ratios 29Cost Ratios 30Liquidity Ratios 31Leverage Ratios 31Efficiency Ratios 31List of FiguresQatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C., Performance Chart (2012 - 2016) 25Qatar Fuel (WOQOD) Q.S.C., Ratio Charts 27












Petronas Gas Berhad (PETGAS) - Financial and Strategic SWOT Analysis Review
Jul, 2017  |  Published by:  GlobalData
Petronas Gas Berhad (PETGAS) - Financial and Strategic SWOT Analysis Review provides you an in-depth strategic SWOT analysis of the company's businesses and operations. The profile has been compiled by GlobalData to bring to you a clear and an unbias...
 
							$ 125.00
							





QEP Resources, Inc. (QEP) - Financial and Strategic SWOT Analysis Review
Jul, 2017  |  Published by:  GlobalData
QEP Resources, Inc. (QEP) - Financial and Strategic SWOT Analysis Review provides you an in-depth strategic SWOT analysis of the company's businesses and operations. The profile has been compiled by GlobalData to bring to you a clear and an unbiased ...
 
							$ 125.00
							





PSE Kinsale Energy Limited - Strategic SWOT Analysis Review
Jul, 2017  |  Published by:  GlobalData
PSE Kinsale Energy Limited - Strategic SWOT Analysis Review provides a comprehensive insight into the company's history, corporate strategy, business structure and operations. The report contains a detailed SWOT analysis, information on the company's...
 
							$ 125.00
							





DCP Midstream LP (DCP) - Financial and Strategic SWOT Analysis Review
Jul, 2017  |  Published by:  GlobalData
DCP Midstream LP (DCP) - Financial and Strategic SWOT Analysis Review provides you an in-depth strategic SWOT analysis of the company's businesses and operations. The profile has been compiled by GlobalData to bring to you a clear and an unbiased vie...
 
							$ 125.00
							





Magellan Midstream Partners, L.P. (MMP) - Financial and Strategic SWOT Analysis Review
Jul, 2017  |  Published by:  GlobalData
Magellan Midstream Partners, L.P. (MMP) - Financial and Strategic SWOT Analysis Review provides you an in-depth strategic SWOT analysis of the company's businesses and operations. The profile has been compiled by GlobalData to bring to you a clear an...
 
							$ 125.00
							





PT Pertamina (Persero) - Strategic SWOT Analysis Review
Jul, 2017  |  Published by:  GlobalData
PT Pertamina (Persero) - Strategic SWOT Analysis Review provides a comprehensive insight into the company's history, corporate strategy, business structure and operations. The report contains a detailed SWOT analysis, information on the company's key...
 
							$ 125.00
							





Southwest Gas Corporation (SWX) - Financial and Strategic SWOT Analysis Review
Jul, 2017  |  Published by:  GlobalData
Southwest Gas Corporation (SWX) - Financial and Strategic SWOT Analysis Review provides you an in-depth strategic SWOT analysis of the company's businesses and operations. The profile has been compiled by GlobalData to bring to you a clear and an unb...
 
							$ 125.00
							








 
                Buy Now




 Single User $ 125.00 Site License $ 250.00 Global License $ 375.00







 

 If the above report does not have the information 
                suitable for your business, we can provide custom research that 
                can be lucrative for your business or enhance your profession. 
              

Custom Research

































Energy & utility Market Research Reports | Bharat Book













































Toggle navigation













  

Bharat 
            Book Bureau
 Your One-Stop-Shop for business information







Welcome Guest   Log In   Register 





   $ - USD 


$ - USD
€ - EUR
£ - GBP
Rs - INR


  |    item(s) :  0    
						
						
											
						  













Market Reports
Country  Reports
Company Reports
Online Database
Custom Research
Discounted Reports
Conferences & Seminars
Publisher Signup



Our Products 

Market Reports
Country  Reports
Company Reports
Online Databases
Custom Research
Discounted Reports
Conferences & Seminars
Publishers Signup








 Search
 







  
        MARKET REPORTS  
        COUNTRY REPORTS  
        COMPANY REPORTS  
        CUSTOM RESEARCH ONLINE 
        DATABASES DISCOUNTED REPORTS 







Home
Categories
Energy & Utility





Consumer Goods

Beauty & personal care
Consumer electronics
Home & Office supplies
Retail
Textiles and Apparel


Energy & Utility

Alternative & Renewable
Environment
Non Renewable
Oil & Gas
Water


Food & Beverages

Agriculture
Beverages
Confectionery
Dairy
Food


Industry & Mfg

Automotive
Defence & Security
Industrial goods & Machinery
Manufacturing & construction
Materials & chemicals
Metals & Minerals
Packaging
Shipping
Transportation and Logistics


Life Sciences

Biotechnology
Diagnostics
Drugs
Healthcare
Medical Devices


Service Industry

Business
Education
Financial service
Insurance
Law
Other Services
Travel & Tourism


Technology & Media

Advertising
Information Technology
Media
Nanotechnology
Technology
Telecommunications




Get FREE WHITEPAPERS on your interested topics, INSTANTLY!!! 
						
Go through the widespread collection of eBooks and Whitepapers offered both on current and past happenings of varied business sectors
 Download Now 


 


Energy & Utility Market Research Reports & Industry Analysis
Bharat book presents comprehensive market analysis and research reports on energy and utilities industry. Energy and utility market deals with various types of energy sources which are available around the globe and their modes of utilization. This sector covers energy sources such as fossil fuel, oil and gas, water, renewable, it also covers the utility linked to the above segment such as fuel, electricity demand and supply and alternative source. 
	 3B reports provide energy industry overview of the global energy scenario, the pressures it is facing, technological reforms of nuclear,  oil and gas future forecast.
Our research reports suggest that the alternative fuel sources are being explored more; such as solar, wind, geothermal, ocean, tidal, hydro, biomass and bio fuels and the technologies and modules of manufacturing linked to them have been obtaining great market strides in recent years.
The research reports indicate the high-rate of exposure and demands for alternative energy forms. The ones which have the most popular markets are wind, geothermal, tidal, biomass and solar. Several technologies are being worked upon in order to bring them in utilization thus increasing their market values in the near future.





 Alternative & Renewable

 Environment

 Non Renewable

 Oil & Gas

 Water









 Sort by 
      


        Title
        


        Publish Date 



         Price 
		
		

 














Global Solar Showers Market Research Report Forecast 2017 to 2021
31 Jul 2017  |  Published by:  S&P Consulting
The Global Solar Showers Market Research Report Forecast 2017-2021 is a valuable source of insightful data for business strategists. It provides the Solar Showers industry overview with growth analysis and historical & futuristic cost, revenue, demand and supply data (as applicable). The research an...

$ 2,800.00
Read More




Global Submersible Lights Market Research Report Forecast 2017 to 2021
31 Jul 2017  |  Published by:  S&P Consulting
The Global Submersible Lights Market Research Report Forecast 2017-2021 is a valuable source of insightful data for business strategists. It provides the Submersible Lights industry overview with growth analysis and historical & futuristic cost, revenue, demand and supply data (as applicable). The r...

$ 2,800.00
Read More




Global Submersible Pool Lighting Market Research Report Forecast 2017 to 2021
31 Jul 2017  |  Published by:  S&P Consulting
The Global Submersible Pool Lighting Market Research Report Forecast 2017-2021 is a valuable source of insightful data for business strategists. It provides the Submersible Pool Lighting industry overview with growth analysis and historical & futuristic cost, revenue, demand and supply data (as appl...

$ 2,800.00
Read More




Global Wind Power Generators Market Research Report Forecast 2017 to 2021
31 Jul 2017  |  Published by:  S&P Consulting
The Global Wind Power Generators Market Research Report Forecast 2017-2021 is a valuable source of insightful data for business strategists. It provides the Wind Power Generators industry overview with growth analysis and historical & futuristic cost, revenue, demand and supply data (as applicable)....

$ 2,800.00
Read More




Global Battery for Energy Storage in Telecom Market Research Report Forecast 2017 to 2021
31 Jul 2017  |  Published by:  S&P Consulting
The Global Battery for Energy Storage in Telecom Market Research Report Forecast 2017-2021 is a valuable source of insightful data for business strategists. It provides the Battery for Energy Storage in Telecom industry overview with growth analysis and historical & futuristic cost, revenue, demand ...

$ 2,800.00
Read More




Global Electrolyte Detailed Analysis Report 2017-2022
31 Jul 2017  |  Published by:  Detailed analysis Research (QY research brand)
This report mainly introduces volume and value market share by players, by regions, by product type, by consumers and also their price change details. As a Detailed Analysis report, it covers all details inside analysis and opinion in Electrolyte industry.This report splits Electrolyte market By Tem...

$ 3,250.00
Read More




Global and Europe Fuel Cell Market - Analysis and Outlook to 2022
31 Jul 2017  |  Published by:  EU Research
This report presents a comprehensive overview of the Fuel Cell market in Europe, which shares the history data information from 2012 to 2016, and forecast from 2017 to 2022.This report provides a detailed analysis of the market, including its dynamics, structure, characteristics, main players, growt...

$ 2,960.00
Read More




Asia-Pacific Emergency Spill Response Market by Manufacturers, Regions, Type and Application, Forecast to 2022
28 Jul 2017  |  Published by:  Global Info Research
This report focuses on detailed segmentations of the market, combined with the qualitative and quantitative analysis of each and every aspect of the classification based on type, spill material, spill environment, vertical, and geography. Based on type, the emergency spill response market has been c...

$ 4,480.00
Read More




Asia-Pacific Hydrogen and Fuel Cells Market by Manufacturers, Regions, Type and Application, Forecast to 2022
28 Jul 2017  |  Published by:  Global Info Research
Hydrogen and Fuel Cells use hydrogen as a chemical element, and are made into batteries that store energy. The basic principle is the reverse reaction of electrolysis of water, hydrogen and oxygen were supplied to the cathode and anode, hydrogen diffusion through the cathode and the electrolyte reac...

$ 4,480.00
Read More




Asia-Pacific Waste to Energy (WTE) Market by Manufacturers, Regions, Type and Application, Forecast to 2022
28 Jul 2017  |  Published by:  Global Info Research
WTE (Waste-to-Energy) or energy-from-waste (EfW) is the process of generating energy in the form of electricity and/or heat from the primary treatment of waste. WTE is a form of energy recovery. Most WTE processes produce electricity and/or heat directly through combustion, or produce a combustible ...

$ 4,480.00
Read More




Global and United States Battery Depth Research Report 2017-2022
28 Jul 2017  |  Published by:  US Market Insight (QY research brand)
United States Battery Depth Research Report 2017-2022Hard Copy: 3190 USDPDF Copy (single user): 3190 USDEnterprise wide License: 6380 USDPages: 158Tables and Figures: 179Published Date: July 2017Publisher: US Market Insight Battery Research CenterContact: Tel: 001-6262952442; Email: sales@usmarketin...

$ 3,190.00
Read More




Global Battery Detailed Analysis Report 2017-2022
28 Jul 2017  |  Published by:  Detailed analysis Research (QY research brand)
This report splits Battery By Battery Disposability, By Battery Model, By Price, By Household Battery Type and By Camera Battery Type. This shares the history data information from 2012 to 2016, and forecast from 2017 to 2022.And this report mainly introduces volume and value market share by players...

$ 3,250.00
Read More




2017 Top 5 Membrane Electrode Assemblies Manufacturers in North America, Europe, Asia-Pacific, South America, Middle East and Africa
27 Jul 2017  |  Published by:  LP INFORMATION
The Global Membrane Electrode Assemblies market size will be XX million (USD) in 2022, from the XX million (USD) in 2016, with a CAGR (Compound Annual Growth Rate) XX% from 2016 to 2022.This report studies Membrane Electrode Assemblies in Global market, especially in North America, Europe, Asia-Paci...

$ 4,960.00
Read More




2017-2022 China Membrane Electrode Assemblies Market Report (Status and Outlook)
27 Jul 2017  |  Published by:  LP INFORMATION
The Membrane Electrode Assemblies market size will be XX million (USD) in 2022 in China, from the XX million (USD) in 2016, with a CAGR (Compound Annual Growth Rate) XX% from 2016 to 2022.In China market, the top players include3MDupont (Chemours)GoreJohnson MattheyBallardGreenerityWuhan WUTIRD Fuel...

$ 3,360.00
Read More




Europe Compressed Natural Gas (CNG) Cylinders Market by Manufacturers, Countries, Type and Application, Forecast to 2022
27 Jul 2017  |  Published by:  Global Info Research
Compressed Natural Gas (CNG) Cylinders is made using the cylinder shape with a semi-spherical shape covering each end. The cylinder and semi-spherical shapes provide the strongest structural shape because the circular and spherical shapes provide for equal distribution of stresses throughout the inn...

$ 4,480.00
Read More




12345678910

16124 Results


























